Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Broker-Dealers, Agents, Investment Advisers, Investment Adviser Representatives, And Federal Covered Investment Advisers
§ 17-4-412.
Denial,
revocation, suspension, withdrawal, restriction, condition, or limitation
of registration.

If the secretary of state finds that the order is in the public interest and subsection (d) of this section authorizes the action, an order issued under this act may deny an application, or may condition or limit registration of an applicant to be a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, and, if the applicant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, of a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

If the secretary of state finds that the order is in the public interest and subsection (d) of this section authorizes the action, an order issued under this act may revoke, suspend, condition, or limit the registration of a registrant and, if the registrant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, of a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of the broker-dealer or investment adviser. However, the secretary of state may not:

Institute a revocation or suspension proceeding under this subsection based on an order issued under a law of another state that is reported to the secretary of state or a designee of the secretary of state more than one (1) year after the date of the order on which it is based; or

Under subparagraph (d)(v)(A) or (B) of this section, issue an order on the basis of an order issued under the securities act of another state unless the other order was based on conduct for which subsection (d) would authorize the action had the conduct occurred in this state.

If the secretary of state finds that the order is in the public interest and paragraph (d)(i) through (vi), (viii), (ix), (x), or (xii) and (xiii) of this section authorizes the action, an order under this act may censure, impose a bar or impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for a single violation or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for more than one (1) violation, on a registrant, and, if the registrant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

A person may be disciplined under subsections (a) through (c) of this section if the person:

Has filed an application for registration in this state under this act or the predecessor act within the previous ten (10) years, which, as of the effective date of registration or as of any date after filing in the case of an order denying effectiveness, was incomplete in any material respect or contained a statement that, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, was false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

Willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with this act or the predecessor act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act or the predecessor act within the previous ten (10) years;

Has been convicted of a felony that relates to practice in securities and investing or to the ability to practice as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, as identified in rule by the secretary of state consistent with W.S.

33-1-304

, or within the previous ten (10) years has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving a security, a commodity future or option contract, or an aspect of a business involving securities, commodities, investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance;

Is enjoined or restrained by a court of competent jurisdiction in an action instituted by the secretary of state under this act or the predecessor act, a state, the securities and exchange commission, or the United States from engaging in or continuing an act, practice, or course of business involving an aspect of a business involving securities, commodities, investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance;

Is the subject of an order, issued after notice and opportunity for hearing by:

The securities, depository institution, insurance, or other financial services regulator of a state or by the securities and exchange commission or other federal agency denying, revoking, barring, or suspending registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or investment adviser representative;

The securities regulator of a state or the securities and exchange commission against a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or federal covered investment adviser;

The securities and exchange commission or a self-regulatory organization suspending or expelling the registrant from membership in the self-regulatory organization;

A court adjudicating a United States postal service fraud order;

The insurance regulator of a state denying, suspending, or revoking registration as an insurance agent; or

A depository institution regulator suspending or barring the person from the depository institution business.

Is the subject of an adjudication or determination, after notice and opportunity for hearing, by the securities and exchange commission, the commodity futures trading commission; the federal trade commission; a federal depository institution regulator, or a depository institution, insurance, or other financial services regulator of a state that the person willfully violated the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the Investment Company Act of 1940, or the Commodity Exchange Act, the securities or commodities law of a state, or a federal or state law under which a business involving investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance is regulated;

Is insolvent, either because the person’s liabilities exceed the person’s assets or because the person cannot meet the person’s obligations as they mature, but the secretary of state may not enter an order against an applicant or registrant under this paragraph without a finding of insolvency as to the applicant or registrant;

Refuses to allow or otherwise impedes the secretary of state from conducting an audit or inspection under W.S. 17-4-411(d) or refuses access to a registrant’s office to conduct an audit or inspection under W.S. 17-4-411(d);

Has failed to reasonably supervise an agent, investment adviser representative, or other individual, if the agent, investment adviser representative, or other individual was subject to the person’s supervision and committed a violation of this act or the predecessor act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act or the predecessor act within the previous ten (10) years;

Has not paid the proper filing fee within thirty (30) days after having been notified by the secretary of state of a deficiency, but the secretary of state shall vacate an order under this paragraph when the deficiency is corrected;

After notice and opportunity for a hearing, has been found within the previous ten (10) years:

By a court of competent jurisdiction to have willfully violated the laws of a foreign jurisdiction under which the business of securities, commodities, investment, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance is regulated;

To have been the subject of an order of a securities regulator of a foreign jurisdiction denying, revoking, or suspending the right to engage in the business of securities as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or similar person; or

To have been suspended or expelled from membership by or participation in a securities exchange or securities association operating under the securities laws of a foreign jurisdiction.

Is the subject of a cease and desist order issued by the securities and exchange commission or issued under the securities, commodities, investment, franchise, banking, finance, or insurance laws of a state;

Has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices in the securities, commodities, investment, franchise, banking, finance, or insurance business within the previous ten (10) years; or

Is not qualified on the basis of factors such as training, experience, and knowledge of the securities business. However, in the case of an application by an agent for a broker-dealer that is a member of a self-regulatory organization or by an individual for registration as an investment adviser representative, a denial order may not be based on this paragraph if the individual has successfully completed all examinations required by subsection (e) of this section. The secretary of state may require an applicant for registration under W.S.

17-4-402

or

17-4-404

who has not been registered in a state within the two (2) years preceding the filing of an application in this state to successfully complete an examination.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may require that an examination, including an examination developed or approved by an organization of securities regulators, be successfully completed by a class of individuals or all individuals. An order issued under this act may waive, in whole or in part, an examination as to an individual and a rule adopted under this act may waive, in whole or in part, an examination as to a class of individuals if the secretary of state determines that the examination is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

The secretary of state may suspend or deny an application summarily; restrict, condition, limit, or suspend a registration; or censure, bar, or impose a civil penalty on a registrant before final determination of an administrative proceeding. Upon the issuance of an order, the secretary of state shall promptly notify each person subject to the order that the order has been issued, the reasons for the action, and that within fifteen (15) days after the receipt of a request in a record from the person the matter will be scheduled for a hearing. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the secretary of state within thirty (30) days after the date of service of the order, the order becomes final by operation of law. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the secretary of state, after notice of and opportunity for hearing to each person subject to the order, may modify or vacate the order or extend the order until final determination.

An order issued may not be issued under this section, except under subsection (f) of this section, without:

Appropriate notice to the applicant or registrant;

Opportunity for hearing; and

Findings of fact and conclusions of law in a record in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

A person that controls, directly or indirectly, a person not in compliance with this section may be disciplined by order of the secretary of state under subsections (a) through (c) of this section to the same extent as the noncomplying person, unless the controlling person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct that is a ground for discipline under this section.

The secretary of state may not institute a proceeding under subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section based solely on material facts actually known by the secretary of state unless an investigation or the proceeding is instituted within one (1) year after the secretary of state actually acquires knowledge of the material facts.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (d)(iii), inserted “that relates to practice in securities and investing or to the ability to practice as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, as identified in rule by the secretary of state consistent with W.S.

33-1-304

” following “felony.”